Texas, session 891, SB68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 11.201, Education Code, is amended by adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (b-1)  A school district may not enter into an employment contract with a superintendent that provides to the superintendent an annual salary in an amount that is greater than: (1)  if the district was assigned an overall performance rating of D or F for the most recent school year in which a performance rating was assigned, the amount of the average salary paid to classroom teachers with the highest 10 percent of annual salaries for classroom teachers in the district; (2)  if the district was assigned an overall performance rating of C for the most recent school year in which a performance rating was assigned, one and a half times the amount of the average salary paid to classroom teachers with the highest 10 percent of annual salaries for classroom teachers in the district; (3)  if the district was assigned an overall performance rating of B for the most recent school year in which a performance rating was assigned, twice the amount of the average salary paid to classroom teachers with the highest 10 percent of annual salaries for classroom teachers in the district; or (4)  if the district was assigned an overall performance rating of A for the most recent school year in which a performance rating was assigned, three times the amount of the average salary paid to classroom teachers with the highest 10 percent of annual salaries for classroom teachers in the district. SECTION 2.  Section 12.136, Education Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 12.136.  [POSTING OF] CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER SALARY. An open-enrollment charter school: (1)  may not enter into an employment contract with a superintendent or, as applicable, an administrator serving as educational leader and chief executive officer that provides to the superintendent or administrator an annual salary in an amount that is greater than the amount of an annual salary that a school district assigned the same overall performance rating as the school for the most recent school year in which a performance rating was assigned would be permitted to pay to a superintendent under Section 11.201(b-1); and (2)  shall post on the school's Internet website the salary of the school's superintendent or, as applicable, of the administrator serving as educational leader and chief executive officer. SECTION 3.  This Act applies to an employment contract that is entered into on or after September 1, 2026. An employment contract that is entered into before September 1, 2026, is governed by the law as it existed at the time the contract was entered into, and the former law remains in effect for that purpose. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.